Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-303
Agricultural floater-spreader implement, defined.

Agricultural floater-spreader implement means self-propelled equipment which is designed and used exclusively to carry and apply fertilizer, chemicals, or related products to agricultural soil and crops and which has a gross laden weight of forty-eight thousand pounds or less and is equipped with floatation tires.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 3.